Nevada, session 83, AB438.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 439.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.410 1. The district board of health has the powers, duties
and authority of a county board of health in the health district.
2. The district health department has jurisdiction over all public
health matters in the health district, except in matters concerning
emergency medical services and nonemergency medical
transportation services pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B
of NRS.
3. In addition to any other powers, duties and authority
conferred on a district board of health by this section, the district
board of health may by affirmative vote of a majority of all the
members of the board adopt regulations consistent with law, which
must take effect immediately on their approval by the State Board of
Health, to:
(a) Prevent and control nuisances;
(b) Regulate sanitation and sanitary practices in the interests of
the public health;
(c) Provide for the sanitary protection of water and food
supplies; and
(d) Protect and promote the public health generally in the
geographical area subject to the jurisdiction of the health district.
4. Before the adoption, amendment or repeal of a regulation,
the district board of health must give at least 30 days’ notice of its
intended action. The notice must:
(a) Include a statement of either the terms or substance of the
proposal or a description of the subjects and issues involved, and of
the time when, the place where and the manner in which interested
persons may present their views thereon.
(b) State each address at which the text of the proposal may be
inspected and copied.
(c) Be mailed to all persons who have requested in writing that
they be placed on a mailing list, which must be kept by the district
board for such purpose.
5. All interested persons must be afforded a reasonable
opportunity to submit data, views or arguments, orally or in writing,
on the intended action to adopt, amend or repeal the regulation.
With respect to substantive regulations, the district board shall set a
time and place for an oral public hearing, but if no one appears who
will be directly affected by the proposal and requests an oral
hearing, the district board may proceed immediately to act upon any
written submissions. The district board shall consider fully all
written and oral submissions respecting the proposal.
-
*AB438*

– 4 –
6. Each district board of health shall file a copy of all of its
adopted regulations with the county clerk of each county in which it
has jurisdiction.
Sec. 2. NRS 441A.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
441A.560 1. An application to a health authority for an order
of emergency isolation or quarantine of a person or a group of
persons alleged to have been infected with or exposed to a
communicable disease may only be made by another health
authority, a physician, a physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, a registered nurse or a medical facility
by submitting the certificate required by NRS 441A.570. Within its
jurisdiction, upon application or on its own, subject to the provisions
of NRS 441A.505 to 441A.720, inclusive, a health authority may:
(a) Pursuant to its own order and without a warrant:
(1) Take a person or group of persons alleged to and
reasonably believed by the health authority to have been infected
with or exposed to a communicable disease into custody in any safe
location under emergency isolation or quarantine for testing,
examination, observation and the provision of or arrangement for
the provision of consensual medical treatment; and
(2) Transport the person or group of persons alleged to and
reasonably believed by the health authority to have been infected
with or exposed to a communicable disease to a public or private
medical facility, a residence or other safe location for that purpose,
or arrange for the person or group of persons to be transported for
that purpose by:
(I) A local law enforcement agency;
(II) A [system] vehicle for [the] nonemergency medical
transportation [of persons whose operation is authorized by the
Nevada Transportation Authority;] operated by a person who holds
a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of
NRS; or
(III) If medically necessary, an ambulance service that
holds a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of
NRS,
 only if the health authority acting in good faith has, based upon
personal observation, its own epidemiological investigation or an
epidemiological investigation by another health authority, a
physician, a physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or
633 of NRS or a registered nurse as stated in a certificate submitted
pursuant to NRS 441A.570, if such a certificate was submitted, of
the person or group of persons alleged to have been infected with or
exposed to a communicable disease, a reasonable factual and
medical basis to believe that the person or group of persons has been
infected with or exposed to a communicable disease, and that
-
*AB438*

– 5 –
because of the risks of that disease, the person or group of persons is
likely to be an immediate threat to the health of members of the
public who have not been infected with or exposed to the
communicable disease.
(b) Petition a district court for an emergency order requiring:
(1) Any health authority or peace officer to take a person or
group of persons alleged to have been infected with or exposed to a
communicable disease into custody to allow the health authority to
investigate, file and prosecute a petition for the involuntary court-
ordered isolation or quarantine of the person or group of persons
alleged to have been infected with or exposed to a communicable
disease in the manner set forth in NRS 441A.505 to 441A.720,
inclusive; and
(2) Any agency, [system] vehicle or service described in
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) to transport, in accordance with
such court order, the person or group of persons alleged to have
been infected with or exposed to a communicable disease to a public
or private medical facility, a residence or other safe location for that
purpose.
2. The district court may issue an emergency order for isolation
or quarantine pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1:
(a) Only for the time deemed necessary by the court to allow a
health authority to investigate, file and prosecute each petition for
involuntary court-ordered isolation or quarantine pursuant to NRS
441A.505 to 441A.720, inclusive; and
(b) Only if it is satisfied that there is probable cause to believe
that the person or group of persons alleged to have been infected
with or exposed to a communicable disease has been infected with
or exposed to a communicable disease, and that because of the risks
of that disease, the person or group of persons is likely to be an
immediate threat to the health of the public.
Sec. 3. NRS 441A.720 is hereby amended to read as follows:
441A.720 When any involuntary court isolation or quarantine
is ordered under the provisions of NRS 441A.505 to 441A.720,
inclusive, the involuntarily isolated or quarantined person, together
with the court orders, any certificates of the health authorities,
physicians, physician assistants licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or
633 of NRS or registered nurses, the written summary of the
evaluation team and a full and complete transcript of the notes of
the official reporter made at the examination of such person before
the court, must be delivered to the sheriff of the appropriate county
who must be ordered to:
1. Transport the person; or
2. Arrange for the person to be transported by:
-
*AB438*

– 6 –
(a) A [system] vehicle for [the] nonemergency medical
transportation [of persons whose operation is authorized by the
Nevada Transportation Authority;] operated by a person who holds
a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of
NRS; or
(b) If medically necessary, an ambulance service that holds a
permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of NRS,
 to the appropriate public or private medical facility, residence or
other safe location.
Sec. 4. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 5 and 6 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Nonemergency medical transportation” means the
use of a motor vehicle to transport a person for the purpose of
receiving nonemergency medical care, including, without
limitation, transportation for a medical examination or treatment.
Sec. 6. 1. An operator of a vehicle for nonemergency
medical transportation that enters into an agreement for the
purchase of its service by an incorporated city, county or regional
transportation commission to operate a vehicle for nonemergency
medical transportation to facilitate the participation of persons in
jobs and day training services is not required to obtain a permit
pursuant to NRS 450B.200 or 450B.210 if the transportation is
available upon request and without regard to regular routes or
fixed schedules.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
incorporated city, county or regional transportation commission
that enters into an agreement with an operator of a vehicle for
nonemergency medical transportation pursuant to subsection 1
shall provide any required safety inspections. If the incorporated
city, county or regional transportation commission is unable to do
so, the health authority shall provide for any necessary safety
inspections.
3. As used in this section, “jobs and day training services”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 435.176.
Sec. 7. NRS 450B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 450B.025 to
450B.110, inclusive, and section 5 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 8. NRS 450B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.100 “Permit” means the permit issued by the health
authority under the provisions of this chapter to:
1. A person, agency of the State or political subdivision to own
or operate an ambulance or air ambulance in the State of Nevada;
[or]
-
*AB438*

– 7 –
2. A fire-fighting agency to provide:
(a) Medical care by emergency medical technicians, advanced
emergency medical technicians or paramedics to sick or injured
persons:
(1) At the scene of an emergency; or
(2) At the scene of an emergency and while transporting
those persons to a medical facility; and
(b) Community paramedicine services, but only if the fire-
fighting agency has obtained an endorsement on the permit to
provide such services pursuant to NRS 450B.1993 [.] ; or
3. A person to own or operate a vehicle for nonemergency
medical transportation in the State of Nevada.
Sec. 9. NRS 450B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.130 1. The board shall adopt regulations establishing
reasonable minimum standards for:
(a) Sanitation in ambulances , [and] air ambulances [;] and
vehicles for nonemergency medical transportation;
(b) Medical and nonmedical equipment and supplies to be
carried in ambulances and vehicles for nonemergency medical
transportation and medical equipment and supplies to be carried in
air ambulances and vehicles of a fire-fighting agency;
(c) Interior configuration, design and dimensions of ambulances
placed in service after July 1, 1979;
(d) Permits for operation of ambulances, air ambulances , [and]
vehicles of a fire-fighting agency [;] and vehicles for
nonemergency medical transportation;
(e) Records to be maintained by an operator of an ambulance
[or] , an air ambulance or a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation or by a fire-fighting agency; and
(f) Treatment of patients who are critically ill or in urgent need
of treatment.
2. Any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to subsection
1 establishing reasonable minimum standards for a permit for the
operation of an air ambulance or records to be maintained by an
operator of an air ambulance must:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), be based on
the medical aspects of the operation of an air ambulance, including,
without limitation, aspects related to patient care; and
(b) Not be based on economic factors, including, without
limitation, factors related to the prices, routes or nonmedical
services of an air ambulance.
3. The health officers of this state shall jointly adopt
regulations to establish the minimum standards for the certification
or licensure of persons who provide emergency medical care. Upon
adoption of the regulations, each health authority shall adopt the
-
*AB438*

– 8 –
regulations for its jurisdiction. After each health authority adopts the
regulations, the standards established constitute the minimum
standards for certification or licensure of persons who provide
emergency medical care in this state. Any changes to the minimum
standards must be adopted jointly by the health officers and by each
health authority in the manner set forth in this subsection. Any
changes in the minimum standards which are not adopted in the
manner set forth in this subsection are void.
4. A health officer may adopt regulations that impose
additional requirements for the certification or licensure of persons
who provide emergency medical care in the jurisdiction of the
health officer, but the health officer must accept the certification or
licensure of a person who provides emergency medical care from
the jurisdiction of another health officer as proof that the person
who provides emergency medical care has met the minimum
requirements for certification or licensure.
5. As used in this section, “person who provides emergency
medical care” means an emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician, paramedic, attendant of an
ambulance or air ambulance or firefighter employed by or serving
with a fire-fighting agency.
Sec. 10. NRS 450B.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.140 1. In adopting regulations under NRS 450B.120
and 450B.130, the board may use standards and regulations
proposed by:
(a) The Committee on Trauma of the American College of
Surgeons;
(b) The United States Department of Transportation;
(c) The United States Public Health Service;
(d) The Bureau of Health Insurance of the Social Security
Administration;
(e) The American Academy of Orthopaedic Surgeons;
(f) The National Academy of Sciences—National Research
Council;
(g) The American Heart Association; and
(h) Regional, state and local emergency medical services
committees and councils.
2. The board may establish different standards for commercial,
volunteer, industrial and other categories of ambulances , [and] fire-
fighting agencies and vehicles for nonemergency medical
transportation to reflect different circumstances and in the public
interest.
-
*AB438*

– 9 –
Sec. 11. NRS 450B.1993 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
450B.1993 1. The board shall adopt regulations to provide
for the issuance of an endorsement on a permit , other than a permit
to own or operate a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation, which allows an emergency medical provider who is
employed by or serves as a volunteer for the holder of the permit to
provide community paramedicine services. Such regulations must
establish, without limitation:
(a) The manner in which to apply for an endorsement;
(b) The qualifications and requirements of a holder of a permit
to obtain an endorsement;
(c) The required training and qualifications of an emergency
medical provider who will provide community paramedicine
services and the proof necessary to demonstrate such training and
qualifications;
(d) The scope of the community paramedicine services that may
be provided by an emergency medical provider who is employed by
or serves as a volunteer for the holder of the permit, which must not
include any services that are outside the scope of practice of the
emergency medical provider;
(e) The continuing education requirements or other evidence of
continued competency for renewal of the endorsement; and
(f) Such other requirements as the board deems necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section and NRS 450B.199 and
450B.1996.
2. The holder of a permit , other than a permit to own or
operate a vehicle for nonemergency medical transportation, may
apply for an endorsement to provide community paramedicine
services by submitting to the health authority an application upon
forms prescribed by the board and in accordance with procedures
established by the board. The health authority must not approve an
application for an endorsement or a renewal of an endorsement
unless the applicant meets the requirements prescribed by the board
by regulation pursuant to subsection 1. No additional fee may be
charged for an endorsement.
3. An endorsement to provide community paramedicine
services expires on the same date as the permit and is renewable
annually thereafter at least 30 days before the expiration date.
4. An emergency medical provider may provide community
paramedicine services only as an employee of or volunteer for the
holder of a permit who has obtained an endorsement and only if the
emergency medical provider possesses the training and
qualifications required by the board. Any services provided must not
exceed the scope of practice of the emergency medical provider.
-
*AB438*

– 10 –
Sec. 12. NRS 450B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.200 1. The health authority may issue a permit for:
(a) The operation of an ambulance or an air ambulance; [or]
(b) The operation of a vehicle of a fire-fighting agency:
(1) At the scene of an emergency; and
(2) To provide community paramedicine services, but only if
the holder of the permit has obtained an endorsement on the permit
to provide such services pursuant to NRS 450B.1993 [.] ; or
(c) The operation of a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation.
2. Each permit must be evidenced by a card issued to the
holder of the permit.
3. No permit may be issued unless the applicant is qualified
pursuant to the regulations of the board.
4. An application for a permit must be made upon forms
prescribed by the board and in accordance with procedures
established by the board, and must contain the following:
(a) The name and address of the owner of the ambulance , [or]
air ambulance , [or of the] fire-fighting agency [;] or vehicle for
nonemergency medical transportation;
(b) The name under which the applicant is doing business or
proposes to do business, if applicable;
(c) A description of each ambulance, air ambulance , [or]
vehicle of a fire-fighting agency [,] or vehicle for nonemergency
medical transportation, including the make, year of manufacture
and chassis number, and the color scheme, insigne, name,
monogram or other distinguishing characteristics to be used to
designate the applicant’s ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle;
(d) The location and description of the places from which the
ambulance, air ambulance , [or] fire-fighting agency or vehicle for
nonemergency medical transportation intends to operate; and
(e) Such other information as the board deems reasonable and
necessary to a fair determination of compliance with the provisions
of this chapter.
5. The board shall establish a reasonable fee for annual
permits. The fee for a permit for the operation of a vehicle for
nonemergency medical transportation must not exceed $200.
Revenue from such fees collected by the Division must be
accounted for separately and does not revert to the State General
Fund at the end of any fiscal year.
6. All permits expire on July 1 following the date of issue, and
are renewable annually thereafter upon payment of the fee required
by subsection 5 at least 30 days before the expiration date.
7. The health authority shall:
-
*AB438*

– 11 –
(a) Revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any permit issued
pursuant to this section for violation of any provision of this chapter
or of any regulation adopted by the board; or
(b) Bring an action in any court for violation of this chapter or
the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter,
 only after the holder of a permit is afforded an opportunity for a
public hearing pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.
8. The health authority may suspend a permit if the holder is
using an ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting
agency or for nonemergency medical transportation which does
not meet the minimum requirements for equipment as established by
the board pursuant to this chapter.
9. In determining whether to issue a permit for the operation of
an air ambulance pursuant to this section, the health authority:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), may consider
the medical aspects of the operation of an air ambulance, including,
without limitation, aspects related to patient care; and
(b) Shall not consider economic factors, including, without
limitation, factors related to the prices, routes or nonmedical
services of an air ambulance.
10. The issuance of a permit pursuant to this section or NRS
450B.210 does not authorize any [person] :
(a) Person or governmental entity to provide those services or to
operate any ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting
agency not in conformity with any ordinance or regulation enacted
by any county, municipality or special purpose district.
(b) Person to operate any vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation not in conformity with any ordinance or regulation
enacted by any county, municipality or special purpose district.
11. A permit issued pursuant to this section is valid throughout
the State, whether issued by the Division or a district board of
health. An ambulance, air ambulance , [or] vehicle of a fire-fighting
agency or vehicle for nonemergency medical transportation which
has received a permit from the district board of health in a county
whose population is 700,000 or more is not required to obtain a
permit from the Division, even if the ambulance, air ambulance ,
[or] vehicle of a fire-fighting agency or vehicle for nonemergency
medical transportation has routine operations outside the county.
12. The Division shall maintain a central registry of all permits
issued pursuant to this section, whether issued by the Division or a
district board of health.
13. The board shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
-
*AB438*

– 12 –
Sec. 13. NRS 450B.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.210 1. The board may issue provisional permits limited
as to time, place and purpose, based on the need therefor. No
provisional permit may be issued for a period of longer than 6
months. The board may establish a reasonable fee for such
provisional permits. Revenue from such fees collected by the
Division must be accounted for separately and does not revert to the
State General Fund at the end of any fiscal year.
2. Unless otherwise limited in the permit, a provisional permit
issued pursuant to this section is valid for providing emergency
services or nonemergency medical transportation services, as
applicable, throughout the State, whether issued by the Division or a
district board of health.
3. In determining whether to issue a permit for the operation of
an air ambulance pursuant to this section, the health authority:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), may consider
the medical aspects of the operation of an air ambulance, including,
without limitation, aspects related to patient care; and
(b) Shall not consider economic factors, including, without
limitation, factors related to the prices, routes or nonmedical
services of an air ambulance.
Sec. 14. NRS 450B.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.230 1. The public or private owner of an ambulance or
air ambulance , [or] the fire-fighting agency who owns a vehicle
used in providing emergency medical care or the private owner of a
vehicle for nonemergency medical transportation shall not permit
its operation and use without the equipment required by regulations
and standards of the board.
2. The provisions of this section do not apply to the equipment
in or of an air ambulance unless the equipment is related to the
medical aspects of the operation of the air ambulance.
Sec. 15. NRS 450B.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.235 1. Each public and private owner of an ambulance
and each private owner of a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation shall file his or her schedule of rates with the health
authority. Any change in a schedule of an ambulance or vehicle for
nonemergency medical transportation must be filed before the
change becomes effective.
2. The health authority shall keep each schedule of rates or
changes filed with it for at least 3 years after the schedule has been
superseded or otherwise become ineffective.
Sec. 16. NRS 450B.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.240 1. A person or governmental entity shall not
engage in the operation of any ambulance or air ambulance service
-
*AB438*

– 13 –
in this state without a currently valid permit for that service issued
by the health authority.
2. A fire-fighting agency shall not provide the level of medical
care provided by an advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic to sick or injured persons at the scene of an emergency or
while transporting those persons to a medical facility without a
currently valid permit for that care issued by the health authority.
3. A person or governmental entity shall not provide
community paramedicine services or represent, advertise or
otherwise imply that it is authorized to provide community
paramedicine services without a currently valid permit with an
endorsement to provide community paramedicine services issued by
the health authority pursuant to NRS 450B.1993.
4. A person shall not engage in the operation of a vehicle for
nonemergency medical transportation in this state without a
currently valid permit for that service issued by the health
authority.
5. Nothing in this section precludes the operation of an aircraft
in this state in a manner other than as an air ambulance.
Sec. 17. NRS 450B.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.820 The issuance of a permit does not authorize any
person, firm, corporation or association to provide ambulance
services or nonemergency medical transportation services or to
operate an ambulance or a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation without a franchise or permit in any county or
incorporated city which has enacted an ordinance making it
unlawful to do so.
Sec. 18. NRS 450B.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.830 The following are exempted from the provisions of
this chapter:
1. The occasional use of a vehicle or aircraft to transport
injured or sick persons, which vehicle or aircraft is not ordinarily
used in the business of transporting persons who are sick or injured.
2. A vehicle or aircraft rendering services as an ambulance or
air ambulance in case of a major catastrophe or emergency if
ambulance or air ambulance services with permits are insufficient to
render the services required.
3. Persons rendering service as attendants in case of a major
catastrophe or emergency if licensed attendants cannot be secured.
4. Ambulances based outside this State.
5. Air ambulances based outside this State which:
(a) Deliver patients from a location outside this State to a
location within this State; and
(b) Do not receive any patients within this State.
-
*AB438*

– 14 –
6. Attendants based outside this State rendering service solely
on ambulances which are exempt from the provisions of this
chapter.
7. Attendants rendering service solely on air ambulances which
are exempt from the provisions of this chapter.
8. Vehicles owned and operated by search and rescue
organizations chartered by the State as corporations not for profit or
otherwise existing as nonprofit associations which are not regularly
used to transport injured or sick persons except as part of rescue
operations.
9. Ambulances or air ambulances owned and operated by an
agency of the United States Government.
10. Vehicles for nonemergency medical transportation owned
and operated by a governmental entity.
Sec. 19. NRS 200.5093 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.5093 1. Any person who is described in subsection 4 and
who, in a professional or occupational capacity, knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been abused, neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned
shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, report the
abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of the older
person or vulnerable person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office; or
(3) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(b) Make such a report as soon as reasonably practicable but not
later than 24 hours after the person knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the older person or vulnerable person has been abused,
neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned.
2. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that the
abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of the older
person or vulnerable person involves an act or omission of the
Aging and Disability Services Division, another division of the
Department of Health and Human Services or a law enforcement
agency, the person shall make the report to an agency other than the
one alleged to have committed the act or omission.
3. Each agency, after reducing a report to writing, shall forward
a copy of the report to the Aging and Disability Services Division of
the Department of Health and Human Services and the Unit for the
Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes.
-
*AB438*

– 15 –
4. A report must be made pursuant to subsection 1 by the
following persons:
(a) Every physician, dentist, dental hygienist, expanded function
dental assistant, chiropractic physician, naprapath, optometrist,
podiatric physician, medical examiner, resident, intern, professional
or practical nurse, physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS, anesthesiologist assistant, perfusionist,
psychiatrist, psychologist, marriage and family therapist, clinical
professional counselor, clinical alcohol and drug counselor, alcohol
and drug counselor, music therapist, athletic trainer, driver of an
ambulance, driver of a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation, paramedic, licensed dietitian, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst, registered behavior
technician, peer recovery support specialist, as defined in NRS
433.627, peer recovery support specialist supervisor, as defined in
NRS 433.629, or other person providing medical services licensed
or certified to practice in this State, who examines, attends or treats
an older person or vulnerable person who appears to have been
abused, neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned.
(b) Any personnel of a hospital or similar institution engaged in
the admission, examination, care or treatment of persons or an
administrator, manager or other person in charge of a hospital or
similar institution upon notification of the suspected abuse, neglect,
exploitation, isolation or abandonment of an older person or
vulnerable person by a member of the staff of the hospital.
(c) A coroner.
(d) Every person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide personal care services in the home.
(e) Every person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide nursing in the home.
(f) Every person who operates, who is employed by or who
contracts to provide services for an intermediary service
organization as defined in NRS 449.4304.
(g) Any employee of the Department of Health and Human
Services, except the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman appointed
pursuant to NRS 427A.125 and any of his or her advocates or
volunteers where prohibited from making such a report pursuant to
45 C.F.R. § 1321.11.
(h) Any employee of a law enforcement agency or a county’s
office for protective services or an adult or juvenile probation
officer.
(i) Any person who maintains or is employed by a facility or
establishment that provides care for older persons or vulnerable
persons.
-
*AB438*

– 16 –
(j) Any person who maintains, is employed by or serves as a
volunteer for an agency or service which advises persons regarding
the abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of an
older person or vulnerable person and refers them to persons and
agencies where their requests and needs can be met.
(k) Every social worker.
(l) Any person who owns or is employed by a funeral home or
mortuary.
(m) Every person who operates or is employed by a community
health worker pool, as defined in NRS 449.0028, or with whom a
community health worker pool contracts to provide the services of a
community health worker, as defined in NRS 449.0027.
(n) Every person who is enrolled with the Division of Health
Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and Human
Services to provide doula services to recipients of Medicaid
pursuant to NRS 422.27177.
5. A report may be made by any other person.
6. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that an older
person or vulnerable person has died as a result of abuse, neglect,
isolation or abandonment, the person shall, as soon as reasonably
practicable, report this belief to the appropriate medical examiner or
coroner, who shall investigate the cause of death of the older person
or vulnerable person and submit to the appropriate local law
enforcement agencies, the appropriate prosecuting attorney, the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services and the Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes his or her written findings. The written
findings must include the information required pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 200.5094, when possible.
7. A division, office or department which receives a report
pursuant to this section shall cause the investigation of the report to
commence within 3 working days. A copy of the final report of the
investigation conducted by a division, office or department, other
than the Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department
of Health and Human Services, must be forwarded within 30 days
after the completion of the report to the:
(a) Aging and Disability Services Division;
(b) Repository for Information Concerning Crimes Against
Older Persons or Vulnerable Persons created by NRS 179A.450;
and
(c) Unit for the Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes.
8. If the investigation of a report results in the belief that an
older person or vulnerable person is abused, neglected, exploited,
isolated or abandoned, the Aging and Disability Services Division
-
*AB438*

– 17 –
of the Department of Health and Human Services or the county’s
office for protective services may provide protective services to the
older person or vulnerable person if the older person or vulnerable
person is able and willing to accept them.
9. A person who knowingly and willfully violates any of the
provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
10. As used in this section, “Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes” means the Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes Against Older Persons or Vulnerable Persons
in the Office of the Attorney General created pursuant to
NRS 228.265.
Sec. 20. NRS 432B.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.220 1. Any person who is described in subsection 4
and who, in his or her professional or occupational capacity, knows
or has reasonable cause to believe that a child has been abused or
neglected shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, report the
abuse or neglect of the child to an agency which provides child
welfare services or to a law enforcement agency; and
(b) Make such a report as soon as reasonably practicable but not
later than 24 hours after the person knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the child has been abused or neglected.
2. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that the abuse
or neglect of the child involves an act or omission of:
(a) A person directly responsible or serving as a volunteer for or
an employee of a public or private home, institution or facility
where the child is receiving child care outside of the home for a
portion of the day, the person shall make the report to a law
enforcement agency.
(b) An agency which provides child welfare services or a law
enforcement agency, the person shall make the report to an agency
other than the one alleged to have committed the act or omission,
and the investigation of the abuse or neglect of the child must be
made by an agency other than the one alleged to have committed the
act or omission.
3. Any person who is described in paragraph (a) of subsection
4 who delivers or provides medical services to a newborn infant and
who, in his or her professional or occupational capacity, knows or
has reasonable cause to believe that the newborn infant has been
affected by a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder or prenatal substance
use disorder or has withdrawal symptoms resulting from prenatal
substance exposure shall, as soon as reasonably practicable but not
later than 24 hours after the person knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the newborn infant is so affected or has such symptoms,
-
*AB438*

– 18 –
notify an agency which provides child welfare services of the
condition of the infant and refer each person who is responsible for
the welfare of the infant to an agency which provides child welfare
services for appropriate counseling, training or other services. A
notification and referral to an agency which provides child welfare
services pursuant to this subsection shall not be construed to require
prosecution for any illegal action.
4. A report must be made pursuant to subsection 1 by the
following persons:
(a) A person providing services licensed or certified in this State
pursuant to, without limitation, chapter 450B, 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 634B, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B,
640C, 640D, 640E, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C, 641D or 653 of NRS or
practicing as an emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic in this State under the
Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure
Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
(b) Any personnel of a medical facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS who are engaged in the admission, examination,
care or treatment of persons or an administrator, manager or other
person in charge of such a medical facility upon notification of
suspected abuse or neglect of a child by a member of the staff of the
medical facility.
(c) A coroner.
(d) A member of the clergy, practitioner of Christian Science or
religious healer, unless the person has acquired the knowledge of the
abuse or neglect from the offender during a confession.
(e) A person employed by a public school or private school and
any person who serves as a volunteer at such a school.
(f) Any person who maintains or is employed by a facility or
establishment that provides care for children, children’s camp or
other public or private facility, institution or agency furnishing care
to a child.
(g) Any person licensed pursuant to chapter 424 of NRS to
conduct a foster home.
(h) Any officer or employee of a law enforcement agency or an
adult or juvenile probation officer.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 432B.225, an attorney.
(j) Any person who maintains, is employed by or serves as a
volunteer for an agency or service which advises persons regarding
abuse or neglect of a child and refers them to persons and agencies
where their requests and needs can be met.
(k) Any person who is employed by or serves as a volunteer for
a youth shelter. As used in this paragraph, “youth shelter” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 244.427.
-
*AB438*

– 19 –
(l) Any adult person who is employed by an entity that provides
organized activities for children, including, without limitation, a
person who is employed by a school district or public school.
(m) Any person who is enrolled with the Division of Health
Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and Human
Services to provide doula services to recipients of Medicaid
pursuant to NRS 422.27177.
(n) A peer recovery support specialist, as defined in NRS
433.627, or peer recovery support specialist supervisor, as defined
in NRS 433.629.
(o) A driver of a vehicle for nonemergency medical
transportation.
5. A report may be made by any other person.
6. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child
has died as a result of abuse or neglect, the person shall, as soon as
reasonably practicable, report this belief to an agency which
provides child welfare services or a law enforcement agency. If such
a report is made to a law enforcement agency, the law enforcement
agency shall notify an agency which provides child welfare services
and the appropriate medical examiner or coroner of the report. If
such a report is made to an agency which provides child welfare
services, the agency which provides child welfare services shall
notify the appropriate medical examiner or coroner of the report.
The medical examiner or coroner who is notified of a report
pursuant to this subsection shall investigate the report and submit
his or her written findings to the appropriate agency which provides
child welfare services, the appropriate district attorney and a law
enforcement agency. The written findings must include, if
obtainable, the information required pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 2 of NRS 432B.230.
7. The agency, board, bureau, commission, department,
division or political subdivision of the State responsible for the
licensure, certification or endorsement of a person who is described
in subsection 4 and who is required in his or her professional or
occupational capacity to be licensed, certified or endorsed in this
State shall, at the time of initial licensure, certification or
endorsement:
(a) Inform the person, in writing or by electronic
communication, of his or her duty as a mandatory reporter pursuant
to this section;
(b) Obtain a written acknowledgment or electronic record from
the person that he or she has been informed of his or her duty
pursuant to this section; and
-
*AB438*

– 20 –
(c) Maintain a copy of the written acknowledgment or electronic
record for as long as the person is licensed, certified or endorsed in
this State.
8. The employer of a person who is described in subsection 4
and who is not required in his or her professional or occupational
capacity to be licensed, certified or endorsed in this State must, upon
initial employment of the person:
(a) Inform the person, in writing or by electronic
communication, of his or her duty as a mandatory reporter pursuant
to this section;
(b) Obtain a written acknowledgment or electronic record from
the person that he or she has been informed of his or her duty
pursuant to this section; and
(c) Maintain a copy of the written acknowledgment or electronic
record for as long as the person is employed by the employer.
9. Before a person may serve as a volunteer at a public school
or private school, the school must:
(a) Inform the person, in writing or by electronic
communication, of his or her duty as a mandatory reporter pursuant
to this section and NRS 392.303;
(b) Obtain a written acknowledgment or electronic record from
the person that he or she has been informed of his or her duty
pursuant to this section and NRS 392.303; and
(c) Maintain a copy of the written acknowledgment or electronic
record for as long as the person serves as a volunteer at the school.
10. The provisions of subsection 8 do not apply to the
employer of a person practicing as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in
this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
(b) “Public school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 385.007.
Sec. 21. NRS 433A.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.160 1. An officer authorized to make arrests in the
State of Nevada or a physician, physician assistant, psychologist,
marriage and family therapist, clinical professional counselor, social
worker or registered nurse who, based on his or her personal
observation of a person or the issuance of a court order pursuant to
NRS 433A.155, has probable cause to believe that the person is a
person in a mental health crisis, may place the person on a mental
health crisis hold by:
-
*AB438*

– 21 –
(a) Taking the person into custody without a warrant for
assessment, evaluation, intervention and treatment at a public or
private mental health facility or hospital; and
(b) Completing and providing to the public or private mental
health facility or hospital the form prescribed pursuant to NRS
433A.085 for the placement of a person on a mental health crisis
hold. The form must set forth the circumstances under which the
person was taken into custody and the reasons therefor.
2. A person who places another person on a mental health
crisis hold pursuant to subsection 1 may transport that person to a
public or private mental health facility or hospital or arrange for the
person to be transported by:
(a) A local law enforcement agency;
(b) A [system] vehicle for [the] nonemergency medical
transportation [of persons whose operation is authorized by the
Nevada Transportation Authority;] operated by a person who holds
a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of
NRS;
(c) An entity that is exempt pursuant to NRS 706.745 from the
provisions of NRS 706.386 or 706.421;
(d) An accredited agent of the Division;
(e) A provider of nonemergency secure behavioral health
transport services licensed under the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 433.3317; or
(f) If medically necessary, an ambulance service that holds a
permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of NRS.
3. To the extent practicable, a person described in subsection 1
shall attempt to obtain the consent of the parent or guardian of an
unemancipated person who is less than 18 years of age before
placing the person on a mental health crisis hold. The person who
places an unemancipated person who is less than 18 years of age on
a mental health crisis hold or, if the person is acting within the scope
of his or her employment, the employer of the person, shall maintain
documentation of each such attempt until the person who is placed
on a mental health crisis hold reaches at least 23 years of age.
4. The State Board of Health shall adopt regulations governing
the manner in which:
(a) A person may apply to become an accredited agent of the
Division; and
(b) Accredited agents of the Division will be monitored and
disciplined for professional misconduct.
5. As used in this section, “an accredited agent of the Division”
means any person authorized by the Division to transport to a
mental health facility pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 2
those persons being placed on a mental health crisis hold.
-
*AB438*

– 22 –
Sec. 22. NRS 433A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433A.330 When an involuntary court admission to a mental
health facility is ordered under the provisions of this chapter, the
involuntarily admitted person, together with the court orders and
certificates of the physicians, certified psychologists, advanced
practice registered nurses or evaluation team and a full and complete
transcript of the notes of the official reporter made at the
examination of such person before the court, must be delivered to
the sheriff of the county who shall:
1. Transport the person; or
2. Arrange for the person to be transported by:
(a) A [system] vehicle for [the] nonemergency medical
transportation [of persons whose operation is authorized by the
Nevada Transportation Authority;] operated by a person who holds
a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of
NRS;
(b) A provider of nonemergency secure behavioral health
transport services licensed under the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 433.3317; or
(c) If medically necessary, an ambulance service that holds a
permit issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 450B of NRS,
 to the appropriate public or private mental health facility.
Sec. 23. NRS 639.268 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.268 1. A practitioner may purchase supplies of
controlled substances, poisons, dangerous drugs and devices from a
pharmacy by:
(a) Making an oral order to the pharmacy or transmitting an oral
order through his or her agent, except an order for a controlled
substance in schedule II; or
(b) If the order is for a controlled substance, presenting to the
pharmacy a written order signed by the practitioner which contains
his or her registration number issued by the Drug Enforcement
Administration.
2. Any person or entity authorized to dispense controlled
substances and dangerous drugs, including, without limitation, a
pharmacy, institutional pharmacy or practitioner, may:
(a) Purchase or otherwise acquire controlled substances and
dangerous drugs compounded or repackaged by an outsourcing
facility directly from the outsourcing facility without an order from
a practitioner other than, where applicable, the practitioner
purchasing or acquiring the controlled substance or dangerous drug;
and
(b) Administer and dispense controlled substances and
dangerous drugs purchased or acquired pursuant to paragraph (a) to
-
*AB438*

– 23 –
the same extent as controlled substances and dangerous drugs
acquired through other authorized means.
3. A hospital pharmacy or a pharmacy designated for this
purpose by a county health officer in a county whose population is
100,000 or more, or by a district health officer in any county within
its jurisdiction or, in the absence of either, by the Chief Medical
Officer or his or her designated medical director of emergency
medical services, may sell to a person or agency described in
subsection 4 supplies of controlled substances to stock the
ambulances or other authorized vehicles of such a person or agency
or replenish the stock if:
(a) The person or agency is registered with the Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Part 1301;
(b) The person in charge of the controlled substances is:
(1) A paramedic appropriately certified by the health
authority;
(2) A registered nurse licensed by the State Board of
Nursing; or
(3) A person who holds equivalent certification or licensure
issued by another state; and
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the purchase
order is countersigned by a physician or initiated by an oral order
and may be made by the person or agency or transmitted by an agent
of such a person or agency. An order for a controlled substance
listed in schedule II must be made pursuant to NRS 453.251.
4. A pharmacy, institutional pharmacy or other person licensed
by the Board to furnish controlled substances and dangerous drugs
may sell to:
(a) The holder of a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 450B.200 or 450B.210 [;] , other than a permit to own or
operate a vehicle for nonemergency medical transportation;
(b) The holder of a permit issued by another state which is
substantially similar to a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 450B.200 or 450B.210 [;] , other than a permit to own or
operate a vehicle for nonemergency medical transportation; and
(c) An agency of the Federal Government that provides
emergency care or transportation and is registered with the Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Part 1301.
5. A pharmacy, institutional pharmacy, outsourcing facility or
other person licensed by the Board to furnish dangerous drugs who
sells supplies pursuant to this section shall maintain a record of each
sale which must contain:
(a) The date of sale;
(b) The name, address and signature of the purchaser or the
person receiving the delivery;
-
*AB438*

– 24 –
(c) The name of the dispensing pharmacist, where applicable;
(d) The name and address of the authorizing practitioner, where
applicable; and
(e) The name, strength and quantity of each drug sold.
6. A pharmacy, institutional pharmacy or other person licensed
by the Board to furnish dangerous drugs who supplies the initial
stock for an ambulance or other emergency vehicle shall comply
with any applicable regulations adopted by the State Board of
Health, or a district board of health, pursuant to NRS 450B.120.
7. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the records a
pharmacist shall keep of any purchase made pursuant to this section.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Compounding” includes, without limitation, the combining,
admixing, mixing, pooling, reconstituting or other altering of a drug
or bulk drug substance, as defined in 21 C.F.R. § 207.3, to create a
drug.
(b) “Outsourcing facility” means a manufacturer at one
geographic location or address that:
(1) Is engaged in the compounding of sterile or nonsterile
drugs for use by humans; and
(2) Has registered with the Secretary of Health and Human
Services as an outsourcing facility pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 353b.
Sec. 24. NRS 706.745 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.745 1. The provisions of NRS 706.386 and 706.421 do
not apply to:
(a) Ambulances [;] and vehicles for nonemergency medical
transportation;
(b) Hearses; or
(c) Common motor carriers or contract motor carriers that are
providing transportation services pursuant to a contract with the
Department of Health and Human Services entered into pursuant to
NRS 422.27495.
2. A common motor carrier that enters into an agreement for
the purchase of its service by an incorporated city, county or
regional transportation commission is not required to obtain a
certificate of public convenience and necessity to operate a system
of public transit consisting of:
(a) Regular routes and fixed schedules;
(b) [Nonemergency medical transportation of persons to
facilitate their participation in jobs and day training services as
defined in NRS 435.176 if the transportation is available upon
request and without regard to regular routes or fixed schedules;
(c)] Nonmedical transportation of persons with disabilities
without regard to regular routes or fixed schedules; or
-
*AB438*

– 25 –
[(d)] (c) In a county whose population is less than 100,000 or an
incorporated city within such a county, nonmedical transportation of
persons if the transportation is available by reservation 1 day in
advance of the transportation and without regard to regular routes or
fixed schedules.
3. Under any agreement for a system of public transit that
provides for the transportation of passengers that is described in
subsection 2:
(a) The public entity shall provide for any required safety
inspections; or
(b) If the public entity is unable to do so, the Authority shall
provide for any required safety inspections.
4. In addition to the requirements of subsection 3, under an
agreement for a system of public transit that provides for the
transportation of passengers that is described in:
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the public entity shall
establish the routes and fares.
(b) Paragraph (b) or (c) [or (d)] of subsection 2, the common
motor carrier:
(1) May provide transportation to any passenger who can
board a vehicle with minimal assistance from the operator of the
vehicle.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 706.248, shall not
offer medical assistance as part of its transportation service.
5. In a county whose population:
(a) Is less than 700,000, a nonprofit carrier of elderly persons or
persons with disabilities is not required to obtain a certificate of
public convenience and necessity to operate as a common motor
carrier of such passengers only, but such a carrier is not exempt
from inspection by the Authority to determine whether its vehicles
and their operation are safe.
(b) Is 700,000 or more, a nonprofit carrier of elderly persons or
persons with disabilities is not required to obtain a certificate of
public convenience and necessity to operate as a common motor
carrier of such passengers only, but:
(1) Only if the nonprofit carrier:
(I) Does not charge for transportation services;
(II) Provides transportation services pursuant to a contract
with the Department of Health and Human Services entered into
pursuant to NRS 422.27495; or
(III) Enters into an agreement for the purchase of its
service by an incorporated city, county or regional transportation
commission; and
-
*AB438*

– 26 –
(2) Such a carrier is not exempt from inspection by the
Authority to determine whether its vehicles and their operation are
safe.
6. An incorporated city, county or regional transportation
commission is not required to obtain a certificate of public
convenience and necessity to operate a system of public
transportation.
7. Before an incorporated city or a county enters into an
agreement with a common motor carrier for a system of public
transit that provides for the transportation of passengers that is
described in paragraph (b) or (c) [or (d)] of subsection 2 in an area
of the incorporated city or an area of the county, it must determine
that:
(a) There are no other common motor carriers of passengers
who are authorized to provide such services in that area; or
(b) Although there are other common motor carriers of
passengers who are authorized to provide such services in the area,
the common motor carriers of passengers do not wish to provide, or
are not capable of providing, such services.
8. As used in this section, “nonemergency medical
transportation” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 5 of this
act.
Sec. 25. 1. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of
this act, any disciplinary or administrative action taken against a
provider of nonemergency medical transportation by the Nevada
Transportation Authority remains in effect as if taken by the health
authority.
2. A certificate of public convenience and necessity to operate
as a common motor carrier or a permit to act as a contract motor
carrier issued by the Nevada Transportation Authority to a provider
of nonemergency medical transportation that is valid on January 1,
2026:
(a) Shall be deemed to be issued by the health authority; and
(b) Remains valid until its expiration, if the holder of the
certificate or permit otherwise remains qualified for the issuance or
renewal of a permit to own and operate a vehicle for nonemergency
medical transportation on or after January 1, 2026.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Common motor carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.036.
(b) “Contract motor carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.051.
(c) “Health authority” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.077.
-
*AB438*

– 27 –
(d) “Nonemergency medical transportation” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 5 of this act.
Sec. 26. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 27. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 26, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB438*